Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6601
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6601 to 77-6611 shall be known and may be cited as the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 67.